Massachusetts, session 194th, S3011.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Resolved, the Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall conduct a feasibility
study relative to constructing a tunnel to connect the north and south campuses of the Essex
North Shore Agricultural and Technical school, and Danvers Rail Trail, a section of the
Massachusetts Rail Trail system.
The study shall examine and evaluate the feasibility and benefits of such a project,
including, but not limited to: (i) the projected capital costs; (ii) possible regulatory or statutory
obstacles; (iii) measures that can be implemented to increase pedestrian safety, increase
accessibility, and reduce traffic congestion; (iv) the availability of federal, state, local and private
sector funding sources; and (v) considerations and measures necessary to protect the public
safety in and around the tunnel.
of 2

The department shall file the report with the clerks of the house and senate, the chairs of
the house and senate committee on ways and means and the senate and house chairs of the joint
committee on transportation not later than 12 months after this section takes effect.
of 2